Massachusetts, session 194th, H3215.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 64 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the first paragraph the following paragraph:-
Notwithstanding any provision of the preceding paragraph to the contrary, a public
utility, as defined in subsection (q) of section 1 of chapter 40D, shall pay 100 per cent of the tax
owed on personal property before an appeal may be filed pursuant to this section.
of 1